North Dakota, session 69, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 21-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Prohibition against Chinese investment.
1. As used in this section:
a. "China" means the government of the People's Republic of China, the Chinese
Communist Party, the Chinese military, or any instrumentality thereof.
b. "Chinese company" means a company formed and domiciled in China .
c. "Company" means a sole proprietorship, an organization, an association, a
corporation, a partnership, a joint venture, a limited partnership, a limited liability
partnership, a limited liability company, or any other entity or business
association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries,
and parent companies, or an affiliate of such entity or business associate which
exists for the purpose of making a profit.
d. "Direct holdings" means all securities of a company which are held directly by the
legacy fund or in an account or fund in which the legacy fund owns all shares or
interests. The term does not include indirect holdings in actively managed
Page No. 1 25.0779.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
investment funds, including a private equity fund, or holdings in exchange-traded
funds.
e. "Indirect holdings" means all securities of a company which are held in a
commingled fund or other collective investment, such as a mutual fund, in which
the legacy fund owns shares or interests, together with other investors not
subject to this chapter.
f. "Majority-owned" means to have ownership of more than fifty percent of the
outstanding equity interests of a company.
2. The legacy fund investments may not consist of direct holdings in a Chinese company.
3. The state investment board shall:
a. Initiate a review of all direct holdings of legacy fund investments to determine
which direct holdings, if any, include securities of a Chinese company;
b. Develop a divestment plan for all direct holdings in Chinese companies, which
must divest at least twenty percent of the total value of Chinese investments held
as of Augus t 1, 2025, per year; and
c. Complete divestment from direct holdings in Chinese companies under the
divestment plan pursuant to subdivision b no later than Augus t 1, 2030 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 21-10-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
21-10-07.1. Prudent investor rule - Exception.
Notwithstanding section 21-10-07, for purposes of investment of the legacy fund, the state
investment board shall:
1. Shall give preference to qualified investment firms and financial institutions with a
presence in the state; and
2. May divest from Chinese companies as defined under section 1 of this Act.
Page No. 2 25.0779.02000